Hawaii statutes.
§352-27 Harboring or concealing a person
away from custody assigned by competent authority. Any person who
knowingly and intentionally harbors or conceals a person who was in the custody
of a Hawaii youth correctional facility, guardian, employer, or any other
person with whom the person was placed by the court or the director without the
permission of the custodian, guardian, employer, or such other person shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor offense. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next